Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 9 Public Works
22-9-210. Renovation of historic sites — Award of contracts.

(a)

The highest quality of restoration commensurate with reasonable costs and obtainable within available funds is considered to serve the best interests of the state. Cost, proposed method, and experience in similar work shall be considered by the agency as interrelated and inseparable factors in the award of a contract. Therefore, the award may be made other than to the lowest bidder. To permit evaluation of bidder qualifications, bid proposal documents shall include the following:

(1)

The types of skills and numbers of persons of each skill needed to accomplish the work, together with the proposed rate of payment of each;

(2)

The anticipated quantity of materials estimated to be required, together with the unit price for each;

(3)

The proposed factor by which subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section shall be multiplied to provide for overhead and profit;

(4)

The calculations contained in subdivisions (a)(1), (2), and (3) of this section shall be extended and totaled to produce an estimated total cost for the project. Bid forms prepared by the contracting agencies shall be provided for the purpose of setting forth the calculations;

(5)

A narrative statement of the methods and the techniques proposed for the restoration work;

(6)

A listing of previous comparable projects completed by the bidder, including location, cost, date completed, and owner's name and address; and

(7)

A resumé of the personal experience of the key supervisory personnel who will be directly involved in the execution of the project.

(b)

No contract shall be awarded under the provisions of this section and §§22-9-208,22-9-209, and22-9-211 until the contracting agency has submitted copies of the invitation for bids, together with all proposals received and the agency's narrative statement of its evaluation and recommendations for approval, to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 869, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-654.2.

22-9-211. Renovation of historic sites — Payment.

(a)

The contracting agency shall establish, as part of the contract, a maximum compensation for the project.

(b)

Payment shall be based on the work actually done and the materials actually used.

(c)

The contractor shall submit periodic invoices for labor, materials, and overhead and profit in accordance with the rates established in the bid proposal.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 869, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-654.3.

22-9-212. Public improvements generally — Trench or excavation safety systems.

(a)

Whenever any agency of this state or of any county, municipality, or school district, or other local taxing unit or improvement district, enters into a contract covered by the provisions of §§22-9-202 —22-9-204 for the making of repairs or alterations or the erection of buildings or for the making of any other improvements, or for the construction or improvement of highways, roads, streets, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, drainage or sewer projects, or for any other construction project in which the public work or public improvement construction project involves any trench or excavation which equals or exceeds five feet (5') in depth, the agency, county, municipality, school district, local taxing unit, or improvement district shall require:

(1)

That the current edition of Occupational Safety and Health Administration Standard for Excavation and Trenches Safety System, 29 C.F.R. Part 1926, Subpart P, be specifically incorporated into the specifications for the project; and

(2)

That the contract bid form include a separate pay item for trench or excavation safety systems to be included in the base bid.

(b)

In the event a contractor fails to complete a separate pay item in accordance with the applicable provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the agency, county, municipality, school district, local taxing unit, or improvement district shall declare that the bid fails to comply fully with the provisions of the specifications and bid documents and will be considered invalid as a nonresponsive bid. The owners of the above-stated project shall notify the Safety Division of the Division of Labor of the award of a contract covered by this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 291, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5504.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

22-9-213. Exemption of state projects from local regulation.

Public works construction projects conducted by the Building Authority Division or other state agencies are exempt from permit fees or inspection requirements of county or municipal ordinances.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1229, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 57; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 57; 2019, No. 910, § 6242.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for
“Arkansas Building Authority”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

Cross References.

Projects exceeding two million dollars, §14-58-1001.

22-9-214. Unenforceable provisions in public construction agreements and public construction contracts — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Construction” means any of the following services, functions, or combination of the following services or functions to construct a building, building site, or structure, or to construct a permanent improvement to a building, building site, or structure, including site work:

(A)

Alteration;

(B)

Design;

(C)

Erection;

(D)

Reconditioning;

(E)

Renovation;

(F)

Repair; or

(G)

Replacement;

(2)(A)

“Public construction agreement” means an agreement in which one (1) party is a public entity and the agreement is the bargain of the parties in fact as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade as provided in §4-1-303.

(B)

“Public construction agreement” does not include an insurance contract, a construction bond, or a contract to defend a party against liability; and

(3)(A)

“Public construction contract” means a contract in which one (1) party is a public entity and the contract is the total legal obligation that results from the parties' agreement under this section and as supplemented by any other applicable law.

(B)

“Public construction contract” does not include an insurance contract, a construction bond, or a contract to defend a party against liability.

(b)

A provision in a public construction agreement or public construction contract is void and unenforceable as against public policy if it requires an entity or that entity's insurer to indemnify, insure, defend, or hold harmless another entity against liability for damage arising out of the death of or bodily injury to a person or persons or damage to property, which arises out of negligence or fault of the indemnitee, its agents, representatives, subcontractors, or suppliers.

(c)

A provision, covenant, clause, or understanding in a public construction agreement or public construction contract that conflicts with the provisions and intent of this section or attempts to circumvent this section by making the public construction agreement or public construction contract subject to the laws of another state, or that requires any litigation, arbitration, or other dispute resolution proceeding arising from the construction agreement or construction contract to be conducted in another state, is void and unenforceable as against public policy.

(d)

A clause described under subsections (b) and (c) of this section is severable from the public construction agreement or public construction contract and shall not cause the entire public construction agreement or public construction contract to become unenforceable.

(e)

The provisions of this section do not affect any provision in a public construction contract or public construction agreement that requires an entity or that entity's insurer to indemnify another entity against liability for damage arising out of the death of or bodily injury to persons or damage to property, but such indemnification shall not exceed any amounts that are greater than that represented by the degree or percentage of negligence or fault attributable to the indemnitors, its agents, representatives, subcontractors, or suppliers.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 874, § 1; 2009, No. 540, § 1; 2011, No. 1123, § 1; 2015, No. 1110, §§ 5, 6; 2015, No. 1120, §§ 5, 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, subsection (b) is set out above as amended by Acts 2015, No. 1120, § 5. Subsection (b) was also amended by Acts 2015, No. 1110, § 6, to read as follows:

“(b)

A clause or provision in a public construction agreement or public construction contract is void and unenforceable as against public policy to the extent that:

“(1)

A party to the public construction agreement or public construction contract is required to indemnify, defend, or hold harmless another party against:

“(A)

Damage from death or bodily injury to a person arising out of the sole negligence of the indemnitee, its agent, representative, subcontractor, or supplier; or

“(B)

Damage to property arising out of the sole negligence of the indemnitee, its agent, representative, subcontractor, or supplier; or

“(2)

The clause or provision requires any litigation, arbitration, or other alternative dispute resolution proceeding arising under the public construction agreement or public construction contract to be conducted in another state.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “including sitework” in the introductory language of (a)(1); rewrote the introductory language of (e); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “site work” for “sitework” in the introductory language of (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1110, in the section heading, substituted “Unenforceable provisions” for “Hold harmless clause,” inserted “agreements and public construction,” deleted “unenforceable” following “contracts,” and added “Definitions”; and rewrote (b).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1120, rewrote (b); in (c),
inserted “covenant, clause,” inserted “conflicts with the provisions and intent of this section or,” and inserted “or that requires any litigation arbitration, or other dispute resolution proceeding arising from the construction agreement or construction contract to be conducted in another state,” and “void and”; and rewrote (e).

Subchapter 3

— Minimum Prevailing Wage

22-9-301 — 22-9-315. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of §22-9-303 by Acts 2017, No. 1068, §
1, superseded the amendment of §22-9-303 by Acts 2017, No. 707, §
87. Acts 2017, No. 707, § 87, replaced “Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department” in subsection (b) with “Arkansas Department of Transportation”.

The repeal of §22-9-308 by Acts 2017, No. 1068, §
1, superseded the amendment of §22-9-308 by Acts 2017, No. 707, §
88. Acts 2017, No. 707, § 88, replaced “Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department” in subsection (a) with “Arkansas Department of Transportation”.

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the minimum prevailing wage, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1068, §
1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

22-9-301. Acts 1969, No. 74, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-631, 14-632; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 1.

22-9-302. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-630; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 2.

22-9-303. Acts 1969, No. 74, §§ 3, 13; 1969, No. 275, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-632, 14-642.

22-9-304. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-637.

22-9-305. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-636; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 3.

22-9-306. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-639; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 4; 1997, No. 221, § 2.

22-9-307. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-636.

22-9-308. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 4; 1969, No. 275, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-633.

22-9-309. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-634; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 5.

22-9-310. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-635; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 6.

22-9-311. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-640; Acts 1995, No. 548, § 7.

22-9-312. Acts 1969, No. 74, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-641.

22-9-313. Acts 1969, No. 74, §§ 8, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-637, 14-638.

22-9-314. Acts 1995, No. 548, § 8.

22-9-315. Acts 1995, No. 548, § 9.

Subchapter 4

— Contractors' Bonds

Cross References.

Contractor's performance bonds and labor and materialmen's bonds required, §18-44-501 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 209, § 6: approved Mar. 12, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “The construction and repair of private and public buildings and other public works being delayed and hampered because of the ambiguity in the statutory requirements for contractors bonds, an emergency is declared to exist and the immediate operation of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1993, No. 190, § 7: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that subcontractors are not currently required by law to insure their financial responsibility through the posting of a bond with the State of Arkansas. It is not in the public interest to continue to endure the resulting poor quality and workmanship which lead to increased maintenance and replacement costs. This act establishes such a requirement and should be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 980, § 2: Sept. 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, No. 980, § 3: Sept. 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that federal law requires changes effective before September 1, 2001, and to ensure that the state contracts are lawful changes are necessary before September 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on September 1, 2001.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-9-401. Coverage.

(a)

All surety bonds required by the State of Arkansas or any subdivisions thereof by any county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit, or by any agency of any of the foregoing for the repair, alteration, construction, or improvement of any public works, including, but not limited to, buildings, levees, sewers, drains, roads, streets, highways, and bridges shall be liable on all claims for labor and materials entering into the construction, or necessary or incident to or used in the course of construction, of the public improvements.

(b)

Claims for labor and materials shall include, but not be limited to, fuel oil, gasoline, camp equipment, food for workers, feed for animals, premiums for bonds and liability and workers' compensation insurance, rentals on machinery, equipment, and draft animals, and taxes or payments due the State of Arkansas or any political subdivision thereof which shall have arisen on account of, or in connection with, wages earned by workers on the project covered by the bond.

History.

Acts 1929, No. 368, § 1; 1935, No. 82, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 958, 7771, 8004, 8883; Acts 1953, No. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1957, No. 209, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-604.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1953, No. 261, § 3, provided that nothing in this section should be construed to repeal any law or parts of laws, or remedies then in effect, with reference to liens for the collection of taxes.

Cross References.

Projects exceeding two million dollars, §14-58-1001.

22-9-402. Authorized bonding companies — Agents.

(a)

All bonds enumerated in §22-9-401 and bid bonds enumerated in §19-4-1405 shall be made by surety companies that have qualified and are authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas and are listed on the current United States Department of the Treasury's Listing of Approved Sureties.

(b)(1)

The bonds shall be executed by a resident or nonresident agent.

(2)

The resident or nonresident agent shall:

(A)

Be licensed by the Insurance Commissioner to represent the surety company executing the bond; and

(B)

File with the bond the power of attorney of the agent to act on behalf of the bonding company.

History.

Acts 1929, No. 368, § 2; 1935, No. 82, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 959, 7772, 8005, 8884; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-605; Acts 1991, No. 1086, § 1; 2001, No. 980, § 1; 2005, No. 236, § 1; 2013, No. 1015, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “and bid bonds enumerated in §19-4-1405” in (a); inserted the subdivision designations in (b) and made related changes; deleted “agent” following “resident” in (b)(1) and (2); and, in (b)(2)(B), substituted “File” for “filing” and “of the agent to act on behalf of the bonding company” for “as his or her authority,” and deleted “agent's” preceding “power”.

The 2013 amendment added “and are listed on the current United States Department of the Treasury's Listing of Approved Sureties” to the end of (a).

22-9-403. Statutory liability as integral part of bond — Limitation of action.

(a)

The liability imposed by §22-9-401 on any bond furnished by a public works contractor shall be deemed an integral part of the bond, whether or not the liability is explicitly set out or assumed therein.

(b)(1)

No action shall be brought on a bond after one (1) year from the date final payment is made on the contract, nor shall an action be brought outside the State of Arkansas.

(2)

However, with respect to public works contracts where final approval for payment is given by the Building Authority Division or by an institution of higher education exempt from construction review and approval by the division, all persons, firms, associations, and corporations having valid claims against the bond may bring an action on the bond against the corporate surety, provided that no action shall be brought on the bond after twelve (12) months from the date on which the division or the public institution of higher education approves final payment on the state contract, nor shall any action be brought outside the State of Arkansas in accordance with §18-44-503.

History.

Acts 1929, No. 368, § 3; 1935, No. 82, § 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 960, 7773, 8006, 8885; Acts 1957, No. 209, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-606; Acts 1997, No. 293, § 1; 2001, No. 496, § 1; 2001, No. 961, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 6243.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment by No. 496 substituted “one (1) year” for “six (6) months” in (b)(1).

The 2001 amendment by No. 961, in (b)(2), inserted “or by an institution … Building Services,” deleted “Arkansas” following “date on which,” and inserted “or the public institution of higher education.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (b)(2).

22-9-404. Subcontractor bonds.

(a)(1)

If required by the general contractor, each subcontractor must provide the general contractor with a payment and performance bond made by a surety company qualified under §22-9-401 et seq., or a cash bond in a sum equal to the full amount of the subcontractor's bid on a portion of a public works contract when:

(A)

The subcontractor is the low responsible bidder for that portion of the contract;

(B)

The state, pursuant to §22-9-204, requires the general contractor to list the subcontractor in the general contractor's bid; and

(C)

The work value of the subcontractor's bid is in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2)

If the general contractor requires the subcontractor to provide a bond, the subcontractor shall provide the bond to the general contractor within five (5) days after the award of the contract by the general contractor to the subcontractor.

(b)

If the subcontractor fails to provide a payment and performance bond when required by the general contractor, the subcontractor shall lose the bid and shall pay to the general contractor a penalty equivalent to ten percent (10%) of the subcontractor's bid or the difference between the low bid and the next responsible bid and the next responsible low bid, whichever is less, plus cost of recovery of the penalty, including attorney's fees. The purpose of this section is to compensate the general contractor for the difference between the low bid and the next responsible low bid.

(c)

The general contractor may enforce this section by a civil action in circuit court.

(d)

The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts awarded by the State Highway Commission for construction or maintenance of public highways, roads, or streets.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 190, §§ 1-3; 1993, No. 1061, §§ 1, 2.

22-9-405. Prohibition on directed suretyship.

(a)

It is unlawful for any contracting body referenced in §22-9-401 or any person acting on behalf of such contracting body to require a bidder or contractor to obtain or procure any surety bond from any particular insurance company or surety company, agent, or broker or to include surety bonds in an owner-controlled insurance program.

(b)

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 771, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Deposit of Securities

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 79, § 9: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 21, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many contractors enter into contracts with the State of Arkansas or one of its political subdivisions for the performance of work; that until a certain percentage of the work is done on such contracts, the contractor does not receive any of the contract price for such work; that the contractor needs cash in order to pay for materials and labor in constructing such projects; and that in order to provide an acceptable method of receiving part of the contract price, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 98, § 4: Feb. 16, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that the description of securities that may be deposited upon withdrawal of amounts retained for payments to contractors under public contracts is inadequate; that this inadequacy can be remedied only by the adoption of the definition set forth in this act; and that in order to provide an acceptable and workable method for the implementation of Acts 1969, No. 79, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 77, § 2: Feb. 7, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of contractors in this state incur considerable delay, inconvenience and undue cost under the present laws concerning deposits to be made in receiving payments under contracts, and that the same increases the cost of construction for public agencies, and that only by the immediate passage of this act may this situation be corrected by providing additional means of making such deposits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

22-9-501. Substitution of securities for retained payments — Contracts generally.

(a)

Under any contract made or awarded by the state or by any public department or official thereof, including the construction, improvement, or repair of any and all ways, roads, or bridges with appurtenances which, by law, are under the supervision of the State of Arkansas or any political subdivision, the contractor may withdraw the whole, or any portion thereof, of the amount retained for payments to the contractor pursuant to the terms of the contract upon depositing with the Treasurer of State, except as provided in §22-9-502, direct obligations of or obligations fully guaranteed by the federal government or any agency or department thereof, obligations of the State of Arkansas, obligations of any public housing authority, or certificates of deposit from federal or state banks or savings and loan associations.

(b)

No amount shall be withdrawn in excess of the market value of the securities at the time of deposit or at the time of withdrawal.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 79, § 1; 1971, No. 98, § 1; 1973, No. 77, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-643.

Cross References.

Projects exceeding two million dollars, §14-58-1001.

22-9-502. Substitution of securities for retained payments — Highway contracts.

(a)

With respect to all contracts made or awarded by the State Highway Commission, including the construction, improvement, or repair of any and all roads and bridges with appurtenances which are, by law, under the supervision of the commission, a contractor may withdraw the whole, or any portion thereof, of the amount retained for payments to the contractor pursuant to the terms of the contract, upon making the deposits with the commission which are authorized in §22-9-501 with respect to deposits to be made with the Treasurer of State.

(b)

All powers and authorities vested in the Treasurer of State with respect to deposits to be made as authorized in this subchapter, with respect to contracts made or awarded by the commission, shall be equally applicable to the commission with respect to deposits made with the commission.

(c)

The commission shall administer all powers vested in the Treasurer of State with respect to all deposits made in regard to contracts made or awarded by the commission.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 79, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-648.

22-9-503. Assignment of retained payments.

(a)

Any assignment of retained payments made by the contractor shall be honored by the Treasurer of State as part of the procedure to accomplish the substitution of securities under this subchapter, except that the assignment shall not be made without prior notification to the contracting agency of the state and the Treasurer of State.

(b)

The assignment shall not impair the equitable rights of the contractor's surety in the retained payments or in the securities substituted therefor in the event of the contractor's default in the performance of the contract or in the payment of labor and material bills or other obligations covered by the surety's bond.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 79, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-647.

22-9-504. Deductions by state pursuant to contract.

Any amount deducted by the state or by any public department or official thereof, pursuant to the terms of the contract, from the retained payments due the contractor shall be deducted first from that portion of the retained payments for which no security has been substituted and then from the proceeds of any deposited security. In the latter case, the contractor shall be entitled to receive interest, coupons, or income only from those securities which remain after the amount has been deducted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 79, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-646.

22-9-505. Powers and duties of Treasurer of State.

(a)

The Treasurer of State shall have the power to enter into a contract or agreement with any state or national bank having a trust department located in Arkansas for the custodial care and servicing of any securities deposited with him or her pursuant to this subchapter.

(b)

The services shall consist of the safekeeping of the securities and of all services required to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter.

(c)

The Treasurer of State shall collect all interest or income, when due, on the obligations so deposited and shall pay the interest or income, when and as collected, to the contractor who deposited the obligations.

(d)

If the deposit is in the form of coupon bonds, the Treasurer of State shall deliver each coupon as it matures to the contractor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 79, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-644, 14-645.

Subchapter 6

— Retainage

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 235, § 8: Feb. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that retainage provisions contained in many public construction contracts to be performed in this state are unduly restrictive and create a serious hardship on contractors performing such contracts; that this act is designed to prescribe the relative rights of public agencies and contractors with respect to retainage under public construction contracts, and to thereby provide appropriate protection to public agencies and to contractors entering into contracts for public construction; and that this act should be given effect at the earliest possible date in order to clarify the relative rights of the parties to public construction contracts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

22-9-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Construction contract” means a contract between a public agency and a prime contractor which obligates the prime contractor to construct, repair, replace, or maintain improvements for the public agency;

(2)

“Cost of the project” means the sum the public agency originally agrees to pay the prime contractor for performance of the contract plus any other sums the public agency agrees to pay the prime contractor for extra-cost items included in the construction project which were not included in the original contract;

(3)

“Prime contractor” means the party which, individually or in concert with other prime contractors, establishes a direct contractual relationship with the public agency obligating the prime contractor to construct improvements for the public agency. Where applicable under the law, the prime contractor shall be a contractor licensed and in compliance with Arkansas law;

(4)

“Progress payments” means the monthly estimates submitted by the prime contractor to the public agency for payment of that portion of the work completed, including stored materials and equipment purchased; and

(5)

“Public agency” means the State of Arkansas or any of its agencies, departments, or institutions or any political subdivision of the state, or taxing unit, and includes any nonprofit corporation or association receiving public funds in whatever form, including grants, loans, and subsidies.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 235, § 1; 1979, No. 594, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-653.

Cross References.

Projects exceeding two million dollars, §14-58-1001.

22-9-602. When subchapter not applicable.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not be applicable to contracts entered into by the State Highway Commission for the construction or maintenance of public highways, roads, or streets.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 235, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-653.4.

22-9-603. Waiver of subchapter provisions prohibited.

The parties to a construction contract to which this subchapter is applicable shall have no authority to vary or waive the provisions of this subchapter by agreement of the parties.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 235, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-653.3.

22-9-604. Procedure.

(a)(1)(A)

In the case of a construction contract entered into between a public agency and a contractor who is required to furnish a performance and payment bond, the contractor shall be entitled to payment of ninety-five percent (95%) of the earned progress payments when due, with the public agency retaining five percent (5%) to assure faithful performance of the construction contract.

(B)(i)

A public agency may forego withholding retainage of the progress payments if:

(a)

The construction contract is fifty-percent (50%) complete;

(b)

The contractor has provided the work in a satisfactory manner; and

(c)

The design professional and public agency agree with and approve of subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(i)

(a)

and

(b)

of this section.

(ii)

This subdivision (a)(1)(B) does not prohibit a public agency from withholding retainage throughout the project.

(2)

If the construction contract allows for phased work in which completion may occur on a partial occupancy, any retention proceeds withheld and retained under this section shall be partially released within thirty (30) days under the same conditions under this section in direct proportion to the value of the part of the capital improvement completed.

(b)(1)

In the case of a construction subcontract entered into between a contractor for a public agency and a subcontractor who is required by the contractor to furnish a performance and payment bond, the subcontractor shall be entitled to payment of ninety-five percent (95%) of the earned progress payments when due, with the contractor retaining five percent (5%) to assure faithful performance of the construction subcontract.

(2)

Upon the approval of the contractor, if the subcontractor completes fifty percent (50%) of the construction subcontract the contractor shall not retain any further moneys.

(c)

All sums withheld by the public agency shall be paid to the contractor within thirty (30) days after the construction contract has been completed.

(d)

In the event the construction contract requires the contractor to purchase and furnish materials or equipment that will be stored on the job site or in a bonded warehouse by the contractor and used in the job as required by the construction contract, no retainage shall be withheld on that amount of the submitted progress payment pertaining to the cost of these stored materials or equipment.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 235, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-653.1, 14-653.2; Acts 2007, No. 471, § 3; 2009, No. 193, § 10; 2015, No. 866, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “ninety-five percent (95%)” for “ninety percent (90%)” and “five percent (5%)” for “ten percent (10%)” in (a)(1), deleted (a)(2) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment inserted the (a)(1)(A) designation; in (a)(1)(A), inserted “and payment” and substituted “construction contract” for “contract”; added (a)(1)(B); inserted present (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “shall be withheld” for “will be withheld” in (d).

Subchapter 7

— Displaced Persons

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1973, No. 12, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly recognizes that many projects are undertaken by various agencies, departments and instrumentalities of the State of Arkansas by counties, municipalities and other political subdivisions of the state, and by improvement districts and other public entities, which are wholly or partially financed by federal funds and which involve the acquisition, condemnation or demolition of real property or some other action which results in the displacement of persons from their homes and businesses; that Public Law 91-646 of the United States Congress requires that on and after July 1, 1972, all states must provide specified relocation benefits and advisory assistance to persons displaced by such federally aided projects; that unless legislation is enacted to authorize such state instrumentalities and subdivisions, and other public entities, to make such payments and to provide relocation assistance and payments to persons displaced by such projects, substantial federal funds may be lost; and that it is the purpose and intent of this act to authorize state agencies, departments and instrumentalities, counties and municipalities, levee and drainage districts and other improvement districts, and other public entities undertaking projects which are partially financed by federal funds to provide such relocation assistance and to make such payments to persons displaced by such projects as will comply with the provisions of Public Law 91-646.”